Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-753.05
Importation of livestock; embargo; violation; penalty.

Any person who shall import livestock or cause livestock to be imported into the State of Nebraska in violation of an embargo issued by the State Veterinarian of Nebraska shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1959, c. 255, § 1, p. 889;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 27.

Violation of this section held not to defeat registration of judgment obtained in Kansas. Miller v. Kingsley, 194 Neb. 123, 230 N.W.2d 472 (1975).